North Carolina, session 2025, SB990.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. PROTECT CAMPUS SURVIVOR'S ACT
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 116-43.17 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-43.17. Confidentiality of research data, records, and information of a proprietary
nature.certain records.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions shall apply in this section:
(1) Personally identifiable information. – Any of the following information:
a. The name of a student.
b. The name of the parent or other family member of a student.
c. The address of a student or the student's family.
d. Any personal identifier for a student, including social security number,
student number, or biometric record.
e. Any indirect identifier for a student, including date of birth, place of
birth, or mother's maiden name.
f. Any other information, alone or in combination, that is linked or
linkable to a specific student and that would allow a reasonable person
in the community of the public institution of higher education where
the student attends, who does not have personal knowledge of the
relevant circumstances, to identify the student with reasonable
certainty.
g. Any information requested by a person who the public institution of
higher education reasonably believes knows the identity of the student
to whom the information relates.
(2) Personally identifiable student disciplinary records. – Any records, including
materials that are described in G.S. 132-1(a), that meet all of the following
criteria:
a. Are made, received, or maintained by a public institution of higher
education.
b. Contain personally identifiable information of or about a student.
*S990-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. Are related to a complaint, investigation, or resolution of an alleged
violation of or noncompliance with the disciplinary or conduct rules
or other policy of a public institution of higher education.
(3) Public institution of higher education. – Any of the following:
a. The University of North Carolina System Office.
b. A constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, as
defined in G.S. 116-2(4), that is an institution of higher education.
c. The Community Colleges System Office, as defined in G.S. 115D-3.
d. A community college, as defined in G.S. 115D-2(2).
(4) Student. – Any individual (i) who attends or has attended a public institution
of higher education and (ii) about whom the public institution of higher
education maintains records.
(b) Confidentiality of Certain Records. – The following are not public records under
Chapter 132 of the General Statutes:
(1) Research data, records, or information of a proprietary nature, produced or
collected by or for state institutions of higher learning in the conduct of
commercial, scientific, or technical research where the data, records, or
information has not been patented, published, or copyrighted are not public
records as defined by G.S. 132-1.copyrighted.
(2) Personally identifiable student disciplinary records, even if release of the
records would be permitted by the Family Educational Rights and Privacy
Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g (34 C.F.R. Part 99). Nothing in this subdivision is
intended to limit the disclosure of public records that do not contain personally
identifiable information."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115D-78 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115D-78. Access to information and public records; small business counseling
information.
(a) In accordance with Chapter 132 of the General Statutes, all rules, regulations and
public records of the State Board of Community Colleges, the Community Colleges System
Office, and local boards of trustees shall be available for examination and reproduction on
payment of fees by any person.
(a1) As provided in G.S. 116-43.17, personally identifiable student disciplinary records
are not public records under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.
…."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 132-1.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 132-1.2. Confidential information.
Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to require or authorize a public agency or its
subdivision to disclose any information that:
…
(12) Reveals personally identifiable student disciplinary records in violation of
G.S. 116-43.17."
SECTION 1.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to requests
for personally identifiable student disciplinary records submitted on or after that date.

PART II. WEIGHTED STUDENT FUNDING FORMULA WORK GROUP
SECTION 2.(a) The Office of Learning Research at the North Carolina
Collaboratory shall establish a work group (Work Group) of experts in public education finance,
including the Department of Public Instruction, North Carolina Business Leaders for Education,
doing business as BEST NC (Business for Educational Success and Transformation), and other
relevant stakeholders, to study and develop a strategy to transition North Carolina to a weighted
student funding model for kindergarten through twelfth grade public education. No later than
Page 2 Senate Bill 990-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
July 15, 2027, the Work Group shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight
Committee on a three-year strategy to transition from the current allotment-based funding model
to a weighted student funding formula model, including policy, funding, messaging, and
technical assistance needed for leaders of local school administrative units and schools within
those units. The strategy shall include an examination of all of the following:
(1) Options to do at least the following under the new funding formula:
a. Consolidate non-teaching support funds into a per pupil-based
allotment with significant flexibility.
b. Transition teacher pay from a position allotment to a dollar allotment
based on average daily membership in order to maintain student-based
funding with greater average teacher pay transparency and flexibility.
c. Reassign all project- or resource-based funding into a set of designated
line items.
d. Determine whether need-based funds can be consolidated and
transitioned into a per pupil figure.
e. Report on spending and provide any other needed accountability for
the use of State funds.
(2) Whether to transition from the North Carolina Department of Public
Instruction to the State Education Assistance Authority the responsibility of
disbursing any funds to local school administrative units.
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to the North
Carolina Collaboratory for the Office of Learning Research to establish the Work Group to
develop a strategy to transition North Carolina to a weighted student funding model for
kindergarten through twelfth grade public education in accordance with this section.

PART III. STUDENT-BASED EDUCATIONAL WALLET PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 3.(a) Program; Purpose. – There is established the Student-Based
Educational Wallet Pilot Program (Pilot) for the 2027-2028 fiscal year to be administered by the
State Education Assistance Authority (Authority) in coordination with one public school unit
selected by the Authority to participate in the Pilot. The purpose of the Pilot is to foster
personalized learning pathways and expand access to educational enrichment by providing funds
for high school students to participate in eligible activities and credit-bearing activities. The goal
of the Pilot is to establish a streamlined process for students to participate in credit-bearing
activities.
SECTION 3.(b) Definitions. – The following definitions shall apply in this section:
(1) Approved provider. – An entity, including a business, nonprofit, vendor, or
other organization or institution, that has been approved by the participating
public school unit to provide eligible activities, including credit-bearing
activities, for participating students.
(2) Credit-bearing activity. – An eligible activity that is approved by the
participating public school unit as providing instruction that qualifies a
participating student to receive one or more academic credits.
(3) Eligible activity. – A program, course, or experience occurring outside the
traditional classroom that is provided to a participating student by an approved
provider and approved by the participating public school unit, including the
following:
a. Career and technical education programs, including student
internships.
b. Art, music, and other performance-based activities.
Senate Bill 990-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. Science, technology, engineering, and mathematics competitions or
research programs.
d. Leadership and civic engagement programs.
e. Athletic and other physical education programs that have some
instructional component.
(4) Eligible student. – Any student who meets all of the following criteria:
a. Submits an application to the Authority to participate in the Pilot.
b. Is enrolled in the high school selected by the participating public
school unit to participate in the Pilot.
(5) Parent. – A parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian of an eligible student.
(6) Participating public school unit. – The public school unit identified by the
Authority to participate in the Pilot.
(7) Participating student. – An eligible student who is admitted to participate in
the Pilot by the Authority and whose parent signs the parental agreement.
(8) Qualifying educational expenses. – Tuition, fees, and materials for approved
providers for eligible activities, including credit-bearing activities.
(9) Student-Based Educational Wallet or SBEW. – An electronic account
provided to a parent for the purpose of holding funds awarded by the Authority
for a participating student to engage in eligible activities in accordance with
the Pilot.
SECTION 3.(c) Selection of Participating Unit. – No later than August 1, 2026, the
Authority shall establish a process to select one participating public school unit for the Pilot. No
later than January 1, 2027, the participating public school unit shall provide the Authority with
the name of the high school in the unit that will be participating in the Pilot and a list of (i) eligible
students, (ii) eligible activities, and (iii) approved providers. The participating public school unit
shall only select one high school in the unit to participate in the Pilot. The participating public
school unit shall enter into a data sharing agreement with the Authority for the purpose of
administering the Pilot and for the protection of student data.
SECTION 3.(d) Selection of Participating Students. – No later than February 2,
2027, the Authority shall make available applications to eligible students for the award of funds
for a SBEW to be used for qualifying educational expenses pursuant to the Pilot. Applications
shall be submitted electronically. No later than April 15, 2027, the Authority shall admit any
eligible student to the Pilot for the 2027-2028 school year who submitted a timely application
and whose parent signed the parental agreement. If the funds provided for the Pilot are
insufficient to admit all eligible students, the Authority may adopt a lottery process for the
selection of participating students.
SECTION 3.(e) Award of Funds. – The Authority shall award funds for the
2027-2028 school year to participating students on a per student basis in an amount of up to three
hundred ninety-five dollars ($395.00) per student. Grant funds shall only be used for qualifying
educational expenses in accordance with the parental agreement. The award of funds through a
SBEW shall be subject to the execution of a parental agreement as required by subsection (f) of
this section. The parent shall then receive an electronic account for the receipt of funds for
qualifying educational expenses incurred in the 2027-2028 school year. Requests for qualifying
educational expenses are subject to a preapproval process established by the Authority prior to
the disbursement of funds from the electronic account. An expense report shall not be required
for any expenses that have been preapproved by the Authority and the participating public school
unit.
SECTION 3.(f) Parental Agreement; Use of Funds. – The Authority shall provide
the parent of an eligible student who applies to participate in the Pilot with a written agreement
to be signed and returned to the Authority prior to receiving funds. The agreement shall be
submitted to the Authority electronically. The parent shall not designate any entity or individual
Page 4 Senate Bill 990-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
to execute the agreement on the parent's behalf. A parent or eligible student's failure to comply
with this section shall result in a forfeit of funds and those funds may be awarded to another
eligible student. The parent shall agree to use the funds deposited into a SBEW only for the
qualifying educational expenses of the eligible student. These funds shall not be used for
noneducational expenses, including personal items or travel.
SECTION 3.(g) Credit Review. – Notwithstanding any policy or rule adopted by the
State Board of Education to the contrary, the participating public school unit shall determine
whether an eligible activity constitutes a credit-bearing activity. The Authority and the
participating public school unit shall establish a reporting time line for the Authority to provide
data on the use of funds for each semester per participating student. The participating public
school unit shall establish a review process for whether a student's participation in a
credit-bearing activity is sufficient for the student to receive credit. As part of the review process,
the student may submit information to the participating public school unit to demonstrate the
student's proficiency in the subject area, including portfolios, performance assessments, and
competency-based evaluations.
SECTION 3.(h) Administration. – The Authority, in consultation with the
participating public school unit, shall administer the student-based educational wallets for
participating students. As part of this process, the Authority shall establish an online portal for
students and parents to track account balances, review eligible activities, and submit
reimbursement requests. The Authority may contract with a private financial management firm
or institution to manage SBEWs in accordance with the Pilot. The Authority may audit a random
sampling of SBEWs to ensure compliance with the Pilot and may contract with an independent
entity to conduct these audits. The Authority may remove a parent or eligible student from the
program and close a SBEW for failure to comply with the terms of the parental agreement, for
failure to comply with applicable laws, or because the student is no longer an eligible student. Of
the funds allocated to the Authority to award funds under the Pilot, the Authority may retain fifty
thousand dollars ($50,000) for administrative costs associated with the Pilot, including
contracting with non-State entities for administration of certain components of the Pilot.
SECTION 3.(i) Miscellaneous. – The following shall apply to the Pilot:
(1) Public records. – Applications to participate in the Pilot and personally
identifiable information related to eligible students receiving funds shall not
be a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. For the purposes
of this subdivision, personally identifiable information means any information
directly related to a student or members of a student's household, including
the name, birthdate, address, social security number, telephone number, email
address, or any other information or identification number that would provide
information about a specific student or members of a specific student's
household.
(2) No refunds to account holders. – An approved provider shall not refund or
rebate any funds to a parent or participating student in any manner. The parent
shall notify the Authority if such refund is required.
SECTION 3.(j) Report. – No later than February 15, 2028, the North Carolina
Collaboratory, in consultation with the Authority and the participating public school unit, shall
study and report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the implementation
of the Pilot and the impact of the Pilot on student success. At a minimum, the report shall include
the following additional information:
(1) The number of students who used funds provided to a SBEW and the amount
of funds used.
(2) The credit-bearing opportunities purchased with SBEW funds and the number
of credits earned.
Senate Bill 990-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) All approved providers receiving funds for providing eligible activities under
the Pilot and the amount of funding received by each approved provider.
SECTION 3.(k) Funds. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board
of Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of four hundred forty-five thousand
dollars ($445,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to the State
Education Assistance Authority to administer the Student-Based Educational Wallet Pilot
Program in accordance with this section. These funds shall not revert at the end of the 2026-2027
fiscal year but shall remain available until the end of the 2027-2028 fiscal year.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 6 Senate Bill 990-First Edition